Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1876.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part II heading of Title 11 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:PART IIFIRST CLASS CITIES[(Reserved)]Section 2. Part II of Title 11 is amended by adding chapters to read:CHAPTER 21PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS§ 2101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 123456789101112131415161718192021 context clearly indicates otherwise:"City." A city of the first class.CHAPTER 28VACANCIES IN OFFICE§ 2801. Council and office of mayor.(a) Special election.--If a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor or other member of council in a city by reason of death, resignation, removal or otherwise, the vacancy shall be filled by a special election conducted in accordance with this section.(b) Temporary appointment.--(1) The governing body of a city may appoint an interim officer to temporarily discharge the duties of the office until the results of the special election are certified.(2) An interim officer under this subsection may not be eligible to be a candidate in the subsequent special election for the same office.(c) Timing of election.--(1) The county board of elections in the county of the vacancy shall schedule a special election to be held not later than 90 days from the date on which the vacancy is declared.(2) If the office is subject to partisan election, each political party entitled under law shall nominate candidates through a special primary election to be held not later than 60 days from the date the vacancy is declared. A special election shall be held not later than 30 days following the certification of results of the special primaries.(d) Term of office.--The officer elected in the special election under this section shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.20250HB1876PN2333 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Part III heading of Title 11 is amended to read:PART IIISECOND CLASS CITIES[(Reserved)]Section 4. Part III of Title 11 is amended by adding chapters to read:CHAPTER 31PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS§ 3101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"City." A city of the second class.CHAPTER 38VACANCIES IN OFFICE§ 3801. Council and office of mayor.(a) Special election.--If a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor or other member of council in a city by reason of death, resignation, removal or otherwise, the vacancy shall be filled by a special election conducted in accordance with this section.(b) Temporary appointment.--(1) The governing body of a city may appoint an interim officer to temporarily discharge the duties of the office until the results of the special election are certified. (2) An interim officer under this subsection may not be eligible to be a candidate in the subsequent special election for the same office.(c) Timing of election.--(1) The county board of elections in the county of the vacancy shall schedule a special election to be held not 20250HB1876PN2333 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 later than 90 days from the date on which the vacancy is declared.(2) If the office is subject to partisan election, each political party entitled under law shall nominate candidates through a special primary election to be held not later than 60 days from the date the vacancy is declared. A special election shall be held not later than 30 days following the certification of results of the special primaries.(d) Term of office.--The officer elected in the special election under this section shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.Section 5. Part IV heading of Title 11 is amended to read:PART IVSECOND CLASS A CITIES[(Reserved)]Section 6. Part IV of Title 11 is amended by adding chapters to read:CHAPTER 41PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS§ 4101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"City." A city of the second class A.CHAPTER 48VACANCIES IN OFFICE§ 4801. Council and office of mayor.(a) Special election.--If a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor or other member of council in a city by reason of death, resignation, removal or otherwise, the vacancy shall be filled 20250HB1876PN2333 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by a special election conducted in accordance with this section.(b) Temporary appointment.--(1) The governing body of a city may appoint an interim officer to temporarily discharge the duties of the office until the results of the special election are certified.(2) An interim officer under this subsection may not be eligible to be a candidate in the subsequent special election for the same office.(c) Timing of election.--(1) The county board of elections in the county of the vacancy shall schedule a special election to be held not later than 90 days from the date on which the vacancy is declared.(2) If the office is subject to partisan election, each political party entitled under law shall nominate candidates through a special primary election to be held not later than 60 days from the date the vacancy is declared. A special election shall be held not later than 30 days following the certification of results of the special primaries.(d) Term of office.--The officer elected in the special election under this section shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.Section 7. Section 10801 of Title 11 is amended to read:§ 10801. Council and office of mayor.[(a) Appointment.--Within 30 days of a vacancy in the office of mayor or other member of council or if an elected mayor or council member has failed to qualify under section 10701 (relating to elected officers, term, reelection and vacancy) prior to taking office, council must, by a majority of council's remaining members, appoint a qualified individual to fill the 20250HB1876PN2333 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 vacant office.(b) President judge.--If a council does not fill a vacancy within 30 days under subsection (a) or if a vacancy exists in the offices of at least a majority of the members of council, including the position of mayor, the president judge of the court of common pleas having jurisdiction within the city, must fill each vacancy upon either the petition of at least 10 qualified electors of the city or the petition of a majority of the remaining members of council.(c) Term.--A individual appointed under subsection (a) or (b) shall serve for the lesser of the following terms:(1) The remainder of the unexpired term of the office to which the individual is appointed.(2) Until the first Monday of January after the next municipal election occurring at least 30 days after the vacancy occurred.(d) Unexpired term.--If necessary to fill the unexpired term of the individual originally elected to an office that has become vacant, an individual shall be elected at the municipal election referred to under subsection (c)(2) to serve from the first Monday of January after the election for the remainder of the unexpired term.](e) Special election.--If a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor or other member of council in a city by reason of death, resignation, removal or otherwise, the vacancy shall be filled by a special election conducted in accordance with this section.(f) Temporary appointment.--(1) The governing body of a city may appoint an interim officer to temporarily discharge the duties of the office until the results of the special election are certified.20250HB1876PN2333 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) An interim officer under this subsection may not be eligible to be a candidate in the subsequent special election for the same office.(g) Timing of election.--(1) The county board of elections in the county of the vacancy shall schedule a special election to be held not later than 90 days from the date on which the vacancy is declared.(2) If the office is subject to partisan election, each political party entitled under law shall nominate candidates through a special primary election to be held not later than 60 days from the date the vacancy is declared. A special election shall be held not later than 30 days following the certification of results of the special primaries.(h) Term of office.--The officer elected in the special election under this section shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.Section 8. Section 12501(b) of Title 16, added May 8, 2024 (P.L.50, No.14), is amended to read:§ 12501. Election and vacancies.* * *(b) Vacancy.--[A vacancy in the office of county commissioners shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term by the court of common pleas of the county in which the vacancy occurs by the appointment of a registered elector of the county who was a member of the same political party as the vacating county commissioner at the time the vacating county commissioner was elected.](1) If a vacancy occurs in the office of county commissioner by reason of death, resignation, removal or 20250HB1876PN2333 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 otherwise, the vacancy shall be filled in accordance with this subsection.(2) The remaining county commissioners may appoint an interim commissioner to temporarily discharge the duties of the office until the results of the special election are certified. An interim appointee shall not be eligible to be a candidate in the subsequent special election for the same office.(3) The county board of elections in the county of the vacancy shall schedule a special election to be held not later than 90 days from the date on which the vacancy is declared.(4) If the office is subject to partisan election, each political party entitled under law shall nominate candidates through a special primary election to be held not later than 60 days from the date the vacancy is declared. The special election shall be held not later than 30 days following the certification of results of the special primaries.(5) A county commissioner elected under this subsection shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.Section 9. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeals under paragraph (2) are necessary to effectuate the addition of 11 Pa.C.S. Ch. 28.(2) All of the following are repealed:(i) Article II, section 4 of the act of June 25, 1919 (P.L.581, No.274), referred to as the First Class City Government Law.(ii) Article IV, section 2(b) of the First Class City Government Law.20250HB1876PN2333 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Article XVI, section 2 of the First Class City Government Law.(3) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (4) is necessary to effectuate the addition of 11 Pa.C.S. Ch. 38.(4) Article I, section 1 of the act of March 7, 1901 (P.L.20, No.14), referred to as the Second Class City Law, is repealed insofar as it is inconsistent with the addition of 11 Pa.C.S. Ch. 38.Section 10. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1876PN2333 - 9 - 12345678910